Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Miscellaneous
Provisions

117.315.
Appointment
of challengers and inspectors.

Each political party is entitled to have not exceeding two (2) challengers at each precinct during the holding of the primary election. Any group of bona fide candidates, as defined in KRS

118.176

, of the same political party equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of all the candidates for that party to be voted for in a county in any primary, including state, district, and all other candidates, may recommend to the county committee or governing authority of the party for the county a list of persons whom they desire to have appointed as challengers in each precinct in the county. If more than two (2) such lists are furnished, the committee or governing authority, in making appointments of challengers, shall alternate between the several lists so furnished so as to give to each list an equal amount or proportion of the appointments, but in no event shall there be appointed more than one (1) challenger for any precinct from any one (1) list. The list of challengers shall be presented to the chair or secretary of the party committee of the county on or before the third Friday in April preceding the primary, and the committee or the chairman thereof shall make the appointments, certify to same, and present a list of certified challengers to the county clerk at least twenty (20) days before the date on which the primary is held. The appointment of challengers shall be certified in all respects as challengers at regular elections, except as otherwise provided in this section. The challengers shall be registered voters of the county in which the primary is held and shall be subject to the same penalties and possess the same rights and privileges as challengers at regular elections, except that the challengers of one political party shall not be entitled to challenge persons who offer to vote for candidates of any other party in the primary. The provisions of this section shall be enforceable against the chair of the political party committees by a mandatory summary proceeding instituted in the Circuit Court. The order of the court may be reviewed by the Court of Appeals as provided for the granting or dissolving of temporary injunctions.

Any school board candidate, any independent ticket or candidate for city office, any nonpartisan city candidate, or candidate for an office of the Court of Justice at the primary or regular election may designate not more than one (1) challenger to be present at and witness the holding of primaries or elections in each precinct in the county. A candidate who designates a challenger shall present the county clerk with the name of the challenger at least twenty (20) days preceding the primary or regular election. The challenger shall be entitled to stay in the room or at the door. The challenger shall be a registered voter of the county in which the primary or election is held, shall be appointed in writing by the chair of the committee, independent candidate, or candidates representing a ticket, and shall produce written appointment on demand of any election officer.

The county executive committee of any political party having a ticket to elect at any regular or special election may designate not more than two (2) challengers to be present at and witness the holding of the election in each precinct in the county. The challengers shall be entitled to stay in the room or at the door. The challengers shall be registered voters of the county in which the election is held, shall be appointed in writing signed by the chair of the committee, and shall produce written appointments on demand of any election officer. The committee or chair shall present the county clerk with a list of designated challengers at least twenty (20) days preceding a regular election and at least fifteen (15) days preceding a special election.

Except as provided in KRS Chapter 242, not later than the fourth Tuesday preceding an election at which constitutional amendments or other public questions are to be submitted to the vote of the people, any committee that in good faith advocates or opposes an amendment or public question may file a petition with the clerk of the county asking that the petitioners be recognized as the committee entitled to nominate challengers to serve at the election at which the constitutional amendment or public question is to be voted on. If more than one (1) committee alleging itself to advocate or oppose the same amendment file such a petition, the county board of elections shall decide, and announce by certified mail, return receipt requested, to each committee not less than the third Tuesday preceding the election, which committee is entitled to nominate the challengers. The decision shall not be final, but any aggrieved party may institute proceedings with the county judge/executive and, upon hearing, the county judge/executive shall determine which of the committees shall be recognized as the one to select challengers at the election.

The committee shall file the names of the persons nominated by it with the clerk of the county at least twenty (20) days before the primary and regular elections and not less that fifteen (15) days preceding the date of a special election. The county board of elections shall, not later than the Thursday preceding the election, certify the nominees of the committee for the respective precincts to serve as challengers at the election where any constitutional amendment or public question is to be voted upon. If more than one (1) amendment or question is to be voted upon, the county board of elections may designate, on the petition of the committee, one (1) person for each amendment and question to serve as challenger at the election.

The challengers shall perform their duties in the same manner and be subject to the same privileges as other challengers at an election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 45, effective June 21, 1974; 1976, ch. 54, § 22, effective March 10, 1976; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 251, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 13, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 470, § 17, effective July 15, 1986; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 302, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 49, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 296, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 2008, ch. 79, § 6, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 176, § 10, effective July 15, 2010.

117.316.
Duties
of challenger.

The duties of a challenger appointed
and certified as provided in KRS

117.315

shall include:

The challenge of the eligibility of a voter who presents himself at the precinct to vote, but who the challenger has reason to believe:

Is not a duly registered voter in the precinct;

Is not a resident of the precinct;

Is a convicted felon who has not had his civil rights restored; or

Is not the person he claims to be.

If the challenger attempts to challenge a person’s right to vote, he shall express his challenge to the precinct election officer; he shall sign the oath of voter executed by the voter if the voter’s name appears on the precinct roster and state the reason for his challenge as required by KRS 117.245(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 288, § 51, effective July 14, 1992.

117.317.
Acts
prohibited to challengers.

A challenger appointed and certified
as provided in KRS

117.315

shall not:

Electioneer or campaign on behalf of any candidate, issue, or political party;

Handle official election materials except as provided in KRS

117.187

;

Attempt to intimidate or harass, verbally or otherwise, any voter who is being challenged or any precinct election officer;

Behave in any manner to disrupt activities at the polling place; or

Attempt to interfere with the proper conduct of the election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 288, § 52, effective July 14, 1992.

117.318.
Ordering
of challengers from polling places.

It shall be the duty of a precinct election officer to warn a challenger who violates any provision of KRS

117.187

and

117.316

to

117.318

. If the challenger continues to violate these provisions, the precinct election officer shall order the challenger out of the polling place. Any challenger ordered from the polling place shall be prohibited from acting as a challenger in any precinct in any election for a period of five (5) years.

The provisions of KRS

117.187

and

117.316

to

117.318

shall apply to all challengers in all elections conducted in the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 288, § 53, effective July 14, 1992.

117.325.
Marking of absent voter’s ballot — Deposit of returned ballots — Record. [Repealed and reenacted.]

117.335.
Counting procedure for absent voters’ ballots — Challenge — Disposal of
ballots — News media representatives to observe. [Repealed and reenacted.]

117.343.
Reimbursement
of county clerk by state board for certain election related expenses —
Submission of claims.

The county clerk may request
reimbursement from the State Board of Elections, for the cost of employing
office personnel necessary for the conduct of elections, including the registration
and purgation of voters in the county. Such reimbursement shall not exceed
fifty cents ($0.50) per registered voter in the county per year. Claims for
reimbursement shall be submitted to the state board by July 31 of each year
for employment costs for the preceding fiscal year. Claims shall be on forms
provided by the State Board of Elections and shall show in detail the employee
time and costs. If the State Board of Elections determines that the claims
are valid and reasonable, the state board shall submit the claims to the Treasury
for payment and they shall be paid within thirty (30) working days. The state
board may issue administrative regulations prescribing the method and forms
for documenting and submitting the claims.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 10, effective July 15, 1988.

117.345.
Cost
of elections — Payment.

The cost of all elections held in any county shall be allowed by the fiscal court or legislative body of any urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government and paid by the county treasurer, except as otherwise provided by law.

When the cost of any election has been allowed by the fiscal court or legislative body of any urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government and paid by the county treasurer, within sixty (60) days following the date of the election, the county treasurer shall certify a statement of the number of precincts in the county, the date, and kind of election to the State Board of Elections, including an election that was delayed or postponed in accordance with KRS

39A.100

. The certification shall be filed within ninety (90) days after the election. Upon receipt of the certification and upon being satisfied as to the correctness thereof, the State Board of Elections shall issue its warrant upon the State Treasurer in favor of the county treasurer for the amount of two hundred fifty-five dollars ($255) for each precinct in the county.

Payments to any county under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall be terminated if and whenever it fails to renew a lease, contract, or lease and option with the Finance and Administration Cabinet executed in connection with the acquisition of voting systems by the cabinet for the use of the county; and payments to any county shall be terminated whenever the county fails to pay any part of the rentals required for any effective period of the lease or if a county board of elections fails to provide training to precinct election officers required by KRS 117.187(2). As used in this subsection, “county” includes urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local government, and unified local government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 48; 1978, ch. 318, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 235, § 18, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 470, § 18, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 33, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 394, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 195, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 71, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 7, § 3, effective March 8, 2006; 2021 ch. 197, § 39, effective June 29, 2021.

117.355.
Election reports to be made by the precinct election sheriff and county board of elections — Contents.

Within three (3) days after any primary or general election, the precinct election sheriff shall file a report with the chair of the county board of elections and with the local grand jury. The report shall include any irregularities observed and any recommendations for improving the election process.

Within ten (10) days after any primary or general election, the county board of elections shall file a report with the State Board of Elections and the local grand jury. The report shall include any irregularities of which the county board has knowledge and any recommendations for improving the election process. The report shall also include a breakdown by precinct of the number of voters requiring assistance to vote and the reasons therefor; the number of special ballots cast by category; and any other information required by the state board.

Within thirty (30) days after any primary or general election, the county board of elections shall transmit the information required by KRS 117.275(4) to (7).

The State Board of Elections shall issue administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to prescribe the forms required by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 176, § 11, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 197, § 40, effective June 29, 2021.

117.365.
Presentation of voter assistance forms, all voter and election official affirmations, and absentee ballot applications by county clerk to grand jury — Certified photocopies.

Upon the first day a grand jury convenes after a primary, regular election, or special election, the county clerk shall present to the grand jury all voter assistance forms, all voter and election official affirmations, and all applications for absentee ballots which shall have been completed in the immediately preceding primary, regular election, or special election. The county clerk may photocopy applications for absentee ballots, voter and election official affirmations, and voter assistance forms, certify them as true copies of the originals, and present the grand jury with those certified copies instead of the originals. The county clerk shall retain all applications for absentee ballots, voter and election official affirmations, and one (1) copy of each voter assistance form as part of the records of the office and shall produce certified copies of any or all of them, when required, to any subsequent grand jury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 13, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 31, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 19, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 2020 ch. 89, § 22, effective July 15, 2020.